tools/hyphenators/se_hyph.tex
uvvo2
uvza1
ux1
uy2
uya1
u1zo
uzza1
u1ža
u1že
u1ži
u1žo
u1å
u1'g
u1´ah
u´á1
u1´e
u1´m
u1´s
u2`
u1`ái
ü1be
üch1
üda2
ü1de
üe2
ü1ey2
ügen2
üh2
ün2d1
ünte2
ü1re2
ü1ri
ü1t
úcu1
ú1sa
1va
v2aa2
va2an
v1aá
vaá1r
vaba1
va1d
va3dea
va1di
v2ai
vak1
vaka1
vala3h
va1m
va2ma
va2mo
vams1
va2n1
vann1
va1re
v1ar2v
vas2k
va3šut
vata2
1v2á
vádjo3
v2ái
vá1j
vá2ji
vá2la
vá1m
vá2mo
vá1ri
vása1
vás3tu
v1áv
2vb
vbá1
vbe1
vbii1
v1bu1
vb1ž
vb'á1
2vc
1vcu
v1ç
2vd
v1da2
vda1š
vd2á1
vdá2l
vdá1r
vdá2s
vd2b
vdbe1
vddá1
v1de
v1di
vdi2m
vd2m
v1d2n
vdna1
v1d2r
v1du
vd1`n
1v2e
veai1
3vearj
ve1du
ve2he
1vei
1vej
vejo1
velo2
velo3h
ve2m
ve2mo
1ven
vena1
1ver
vere1
veru1
vese1
ves3t
ve1ša
2v1f2
v2fm
2vg
vga1
1vgav
vgá2l
vgga1
vgi2
v1g2ŋ
v1go
vgo1h
vg2s
vgu1
v2h
vha2
1v2i
1vi.
1via
1viá
1vib
1vic
1vič
1vi1d
vi1da
2v1idj
vid1n
3viđát
1viđe
1viđi
1vie
vi1em
1vig1
1vih
vi2he
1vii
vii1d
1vi2k1
1vil
vi2la
vilo1
1vim
vi2me
vi2mo
1vin
1vi1o
vi1ra
vi1re
vi2ri
vi1ro
1vi1s
1viš
1vit
viu1
1viv
2vj
v1ja
v1já
v1je
vje1h1
v1ji
vjja1
vjjás3
vjjo2
v1jo
v1ju
2vk
v1ka
vka2l
vkan1
vka2r
v1ke
vke2m
v1ki
v1ko
vko2l
vko1s
vksi1
v1ku
2vl
v1la
vla1d
vla2g
v1lá2
v1le
vle1s
v1li
vlli2
vl2o1
vlom1
vlo2n
vlo2s
vl2t
v1lu2
2v2m2
vmá1r
vm1p
v1mö
2vn
v2na
vná1
v1ne2
v1ni
v1nj
vnna1
vnná2
vnni1
vn2s
2vŋ
vŋŋa1
vŋŋá2
3vo
vo1a1
vo1b
voba1
v1ođ
vo1g
vo1h
vo3lač
vol2l
vo1lu
vo1m
vo2ma
vo2mo
vo2ni
vo1nj
v2or
vora2
vo3saž
voš2t
v2ot
vo2va
vox2
2vp
vpá1s
vpe1
vpi2
vpo1
vppá2
v1pr
v1q
2vr
v1ra
vran1
v1rá2
v1re1
vreg1
vre2n
vr2g
v1ri2
vri1l
v1ro1
v2roi
vro2s
vrru2
v1ru2
2vs
v2sa1
vsá1
vs2be
v2se
v1si
vsii1
vs2k
v1ská
v1ske
v1sko2
v1sku
vssi2
vs2t
v1sta
v1stá
v1sti
vstu1
vs2ž
v1š
v1šo
vššá2
2v2t1
v1ta
v1tá
vtme1
vtta3v
vttá1
vtte2
v1tu
3vu
v1ub
vu1be
vui1
v2ul
vu1la
vuol1
vuro3h
vuros3
2v1v2
vvak1
vva1l
vva2r
vvá1d
vvá2r
vvás1
vve1h
vvi2d
vvi1h
vvi2s2
vvo2l
vvs1
vvs2s
vvu1h
vwá2
vwár1
v1y1
vya2
v2ys
2vz
vza1s
v1zo
2v2ž
v1že
v1ži
v1žo2
vžža1
1vær
1vä
väi1
1v1ø
v1øy
vå2
vå2g
vår1
2v2'
v1'ah
v1'ái
v1'b
v'ii1
v1'n
v1's
2v2´
v1´am
v1´ái
v1´b
v1´d
v2`
v1`ab
v`a1n
v1`b
v1`g
v2`ge
2w2a
wai2
wale1
wan1
wa1ri
wá1r
wár1e
w1b
1wc
wcá1
wci1
wc2m
wc1`á
wc`n1
w2d
wd2g
wd2h
1we
wea2
wed1
werp1
w2f
wfs1
w2g
wg1o
w2h
wha2
whoi1
whor1
wh1ø
1w2i
wich1
wii2
w1iis
wi2k
1wit1
wit2t
2w1k2
w2l
w2m2
wm1is
w2n
wn1d
1wo
w1oa
wo1g
wo1ki
w1q
w1r2
w1re2
w2s2
wslø1
1wso1
w1st
wsu1
w2t
1wto
wton1
wtš1
wuc1
wu1h
wu1l
wur1
wux1
w1v
w2w2
wwa1
ww1á
wwt1
ww2ž
w1y
wyo1
wytr1
wz2
2w2ž
w1øy
w1'2s
2w2´
w1´m
w1´s
1x2a
xa2g1
x1ah
x1al
x1am
xa2n
xas2
1xase
1x2á
xár1e
x1b2
x1br
x2c1am
x1d
x1e
xe1n
1xerx
xe1s
xesa1
x2g
xgo1
x1h
x2ha
xhal2
xham2
xhol1
x1i1
x1ia
xian2
x1ic
x2ii
x1i2l
xi2n
x1is
1x1k
x1l
xlø1
x2m
x1o
x1p2
xpe1
xpi1
x1r
x1sh
x1sk
x1šo
1xtr
x1tu
x1þ
x1v
xx2i
1x1y
x1ø
x1'b
x1'e
x´á1
x1`2
y1a
y2ad
yafi1
y2ah
y2ai
y2ak
1y2am
ya1r
y2a1s
yas2t
y2aš
yat2
y2av
ya2z
y1á
1yák
y2á1r
y2ás
1yáv
2y1b2
y1be2
yber1
yc1
y2ca
1yd.
y1da1
y1de
yden1
yd1i
yd1n
y2dy
y2e1
y1ea
y1e2i
y1e2l1
y1en
yere1
yer2s
ye2s1
y1et
y1f
yfi2
y1g
yg2d
ygia2
y2ha
yhan2
yh2r
y2hu1
yhu2s
y2i2
yic1
1yid
yida2
yi2do
y2ii1
y1is
y1ja
y1jo
y1ka
y1ke
y1ki
y1ko
yko1a
yko1s
y2kv
y1la
y1le
y1li
y2lit
ylo1
y1lu
y2lut
2ym
ymri1
ym1s
y1mu
yn2a
y1nag
yna2l
yn1d2
yne1
y2n1er
y1nes
ynge1
ynia2
ynk2
y1no
yn1s
ynte1
1yo
y1oa
yoko1
y1o1m
yo1s
y1ot
y1ou1
y2p1
ypda2
ypo1
yp1r
y1r
y2ra2l
yra2s
yrat2
yr2d
1yrk
yr1s
ysa1
ysat2
ys1av
y2sá1
y1se
y1si
ysk2
yske1
ys1ki
yso3
yss1ž
2y2st
ys1tu
y1su
y1ta
ytan1
ytá2
yti1
yt2s2
yur3ta
y1v
yve1
y2vi
yvol1
yx1
y1z2
y1ž
yä2
y1'á
y1´á
y1`g
y`´2
ý2r
ýr1d
1z2a
za2a
za2d
za2g
za1h
zahá1
za2l1
zal1c
za2n
z1ar
zar2d
za2se1
zask2
zat2t
1zá
zá2j
zá2l
zá2m
zás2
2z1b
zba2
zbe1
zbur2
z1c
1z2d
zden1
1z2e
ze1a
ze1b
zee2
zeh1
ze2m
zer2
zes1
2z1g
2zh2
zha1n
zhá1
z2hm
z1ho
zh1ž
1zi
zi1b
zi2d
zi1e
zi2l
zir1
zi2s2
z1í
z1je
2z1m
zmir2
zn2
z1na
znam2
2z1oa
zodi1
z1oi
zo2m
zo2n
zra2
z1š
1z2u
zu2g
zui1
zu2l
zulu1
zu2m
1zü1
zün1
2z1v
zy2
2z1z
zza1s
z1ö
zå2
1ž2a
2žač
ža1d
ža1g
1žaga
ža2gi
ža2gu
1žah
1žai1
žai1n
1žak
1ža2l
žame1
žan1
žan2a
1žas.
ža3sam
ža2t
1žatg
1žatm
1žatv
1žá2
žá2j
žá2la
žán1
žás2
2žb
žbe1
ž2c
1že
1že.
že1a
1žeb
1žed
2žei
žema1
že2mo
1žes
1žež
žfær1
2žg
2žh
ž2hi
ži2
1ži.
1žih
1žii1
1žik
1žin
ži2s2
žisš1
1žit
ž1k
žkon1
2ž1m
2ž1n
1žo
ž1oa
ž1oi
žo2ma
žo2n1
2žp
žrø1r
2žs2
1žu2
žuid1
žu2ma
žu2mo
2ž1v
2ž1ž
æb2
æbh1
æci1
æde2
æd1n
1ædna
æeb1
æé2
æ1f
æfe2
æ2g
ægr1
æi1r
æ2ki
æ1l
æl1t
æ2n2
æne1
æras1
æ1re1
æren2
æ1ri
æri1e
ær2k
æ2r1o
æ1ru
ærum1
ær1øn
1æs1k
æso2
æs1t2
æsub1
æ1sø
æš2
ætta1
æv2
æwi1
æå2
æår1
æåt1
äam1
äáv2
äávd1
äc2
ä1d
äec1
äé2
äf2
äi1l
äi2s
ä1j
äk2m
ä1l
ä2la
älc1
äl2v
ämø1
ä1mö
ä1n
än2ga
änn1
än1s
änt1
äpa2
äpe1
ä1r
ärge1
1ärvä
äske1
äs2la
äs2n
ä1sä
äuks1
äu1r
ä1vä
1äy
äæ1
ä2ä
ä1äp
ä1är
ä1äv
äö1
ø1a
øb1
øbin2
øch1
ø1d
ø2da
øde1
ø1e
øen2
2øf
øfa1
ø2f1j
øfta2
2øg1
øh2n
øh2r
2øi
ø1ie
øi1n2
øi1s
2ø1k
1øk.
1øka
øke1
økii1
økka2
øko1
øl2
ø2la
ø1le1
øle1m
ømna2
øn1
øna2
øn1s
2øp
øra1h
øram1
ørá1
ørc2
ørea2
1ørn
ørne2
ø1ro
ø2s
øs1á
1øsk.
øs1ž
øš2
øta2r1
øtta2
1øv
øve2
øver1
øvii1
1øw
øx1
ø2y
1øy.
1øy2a1
1øye
1øyi
1øym
øy1n
øy1s
øza1
øå2
øår1
öb1
öd2
öei1
öela1
ögai1
öh2
öh2n
öh2r
ö1hö
öi2
ö1ku
ökul2
ö2la
ö1lá
ölha1
öl2l
ölm1
ö2m
ömed1
ö1n
ö2na
ön1d
ö2ne1
öo2
öp2
ör1
ör2i
ör2k
ör2n
ö1sa
öse1
ö2s1o
ös2r
1öst
öš2
öte1
öv2
1öy1
öøst1
öå2
öåm1
å2a
åa2l
å1am
å1a1s
å1á
å1b2
å1d
å1da2
åde1
å2dn
åd1ne
åd1ni
å2e
åech1
å2f
1åf1j
åfos2
å1g
ågen2
åh2
åhi1
å2hm
å2i
åi2a
åio1
å1k2
åkra1
åk2ro
åk2s
å2kv
å1l
å2la1
ålas1
ålfo1
ålii1
ål2s
1åm
åm2s1
å1n2
åne2
ån2n1
1ån1s
å1o
åpas1
å1pr
åra2n1
å1r1e
1årg
1åri
år2s
år2t
åru1
å1s2
å2sa
åsen2
å2sf
å2si
å2sk
å2sn
å2st2
1å2su
å1ta2
åtai1
åtan1
åt2h
åt2n
å2tr
1ått
åtvi1
åt2'
åt1`á
2åv
åvi1
å2vø
å1å1l
'abe1
'1ah
'1al
'1am
'a2n1
2'as1
2'at
'2á
2'ár
'2b
'be1
'1č
'1d2
'1e
'1g
'2h
'ha2
2'2i2
'id1
'ii2n
'1l
'2m
'mi2
'2n
'1o
'2or
'1r
's2
't1
'1tw
2'ž
'1å
2''2
2'´1
'´2n
2'`1
´2a
´1ah
´1al
´an1
´2á1
´2b
´be1
´ben1
´1d
´1e
´1f
´2g
´2h
´han1
2´i2
´ii2n
´2m
´1n
2´s
´s1y
´2t1
2´ž
2´'2
2´´2
2´`1
´`2h
`2a
`1ab
`1ah
`ai1
`1al
`1am
`ár1t
`2b
`be1
`1d
`1e
`1f
`2g
2`ge
`1h
`han1
2`i2
`id1
`1iđ
`2m
`2n
`ng2
`no2
`nob1
`pe2
`per1
2`s
`1š
2`2t1
`tš1
`1y
2`ž
2`'1
`´1
`´2n
2``1
°c1
°ceb1
°f1
°fo2
°fvi1
°fx1
